Massachusetts, session 194th, H760.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
Section XXXXX is added to read:
Each year from October 1 through February 1 of the following year and in accordance
with the latest recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, each hospital shall offer, prior to discharge,
immunizations against influenza virus to all inpatients sixty-five years of age and older, unless
contraindicated, and contingent upon the availability of the vaccine.
of 1